Washington statutes.
RCW 18.170.210

Application of administrative procedure act to hearings.

The procedures governing adjudicative proceedings before agencies under chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act, govern all hearings before the director.

[ 1991 c 334 s 21.]